Colorado statutes. TITLE 6 Consumer and Commercial Affairs
PART 7
SPECIFIC PROVISIONS

Editor's note:

This part 7 was added with relocations in 1999. Former C.R.S. section numbers are shown in editor's notes following those sections that were relocated.

6-1-701. Dispensing hearing aids - deceptive trade practices - definitions.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Dispense", with regard to a hearing aid, means to sell or transfer title, possession, or the right to use by lease, bailment, or any other method. The term does not apply to wholesale transactions with distributors or dealers.

"Dispenser" means a person who dispenses hearing aids.

"Hearing aid" means any wearable instrument or device designed or offered to aid or compensate for impaired human hearing and includes:

Any parts, attachments, or accessories to the instrument or device, as defined in rules adopted by the director of the division of professions and occupations in the department of regulatory agencies; and

Ear molds, excluding batteries and cords.

"Hearing aid" does not include a surgically implanted hearing device.

"Practice of dispensing, fitting, or dealing in hearing aids" includes:

Selecting and adapting hearing aids for sale;

Testing human hearing for purposes of selecting and adapting hearing aids for sale; and

Making impressions for ear molds and counseling and instructing prospective users for purposes of selecting, fitting, adapting, or selling hearing aids.

"Surgically implanted hearing device" means a device that is designed to produce useful hearing sensations to a person with a hearing impairment and that has, as one or more components, a unit that is surgically implanted into the ear, skull, or other interior part of the body. The term includes any associated unit that may be worn on the body.

In addition to any other deceptive trade practices under section 6-1-105, a dispenser engages in a deceptive trade practice when the dispenser:

Fails to deliver to each person to whom the dispenser dispenses a hearing aid a receipt that:

Bears the business address of the dispenser together with specifications as to the make and serial number of the hearing aid furnished and the full terms of the sale clearly stated. If the dispenser dispenses a hearing aid that is not new, the dispenser shall clearly mark on the hearing aid container and the receipt the term "used" or "reconditioned", whichever is applicable, within the terms of the guarantee, if any.

Bears, in no smaller type than the largest used in the body of the receipt, in substance, a provision that the buyer has been advised at the outset of the buyer's relationship with the dispenser that any examination or representation made by a dispenser in connection with the practice of dispensing, fitting, or dealing in hearing aids is not an examination, diagnosis, or prescription by a person licensed to practice medicine in this state and, therefore, must not be regarded as medical opinion or advice;

Bears, in no smaller type than the largest used in the body of the receipt, a provision indicating that dispensers who are licensed by the department of regulatory agencies are regulated by the division of professions and occupations in the department of regulatory agencies; and

Bears a provision labeled "warranty" in which the exact warranty terms and periods available from the manufacturer are documented, or includes an original or photocopy of the original manufacturer's warranty with the receipt;

Dispenses a hearing aid to a child under eighteen years of age without receiving documentation that the child has been examined by a licensed physician and an audiologist within six months prior to the fitting;

Dispenses, adjusts, provides training or teaching in regard to, or otherwise services surgically implanted hearing devices unless the dispenser is an audiologist or physician;

Fails to recommend in writing, prior to fitting or dispensing a hearing aid, that the best interests of the prospective user would be served by consulting a licensed physician specializing in diseases of the ear, or any licensed physician, if any of the following conditions exist:

Visible congenital or traumatic deformity of the ear;

Active drainage of the ear, or a history of drainage of the ear within the previous ninety days;

History of sudden or rapidly progressive hearing loss;

Acute or chronic dizziness;

Unilateral hearing loss of sudden onset within the previous ninety days;

Audiometric air-bone gap equal to or greater than fifteen decibels at 500 hertz (Hz), 1,000 Hz, and 2,000 Hz;

Visible evidence of significant cerumen accumulation on, or a foreign body in, the ear canal;

Pain or discomfort in the ear;

Fails to provide a minimum thirty-day rescission period with the following terms:

The buyer has the right to cancel the purchase for any reason before the expiration of the rescission period by giving or mailing written notice of cancellation to the dispenser and presenting the hearing aid to the dispenser, unless the hearing aid has been lost or significantly damaged beyond repair while in the buyer's possession and control. The rescission period is tolled for any period during which a dispenser takes possession or control of a hearing aid after its original delivery.

The buyer, upon cancellation, is entitled to receive a full refund of any payment made for the hearing aid within thirty days after returning the hearing aid to the dispenser, unless the hearing aid was significantly damaged beyond repair while the hearing aid was in the buyer's possession and control;

The dispenser shall provide a written receipt or contract to the buyer that includes, in immediate proximity to the space reserved for the signature of the buyer, the following specific statement in all capital letters of no less than ten-point, bold-faced type:

The written contract or receipt provided to the buyer must also contain a statement, in print size no smaller than ten-point type, that the sale is void and unenforceable if the hearing aid being purchased is not delivered to the consumer within thirty days after the date the written contract is signed or the receipt is issued, whichever occurs later. The written contract or receipt must also include the dispenser's license number, if the dispenser is required to be licensed by the state, and a statement that the dispenser will promptly refund all money paid for the purchase of a hearing aid if it is not delivered to the consumer within the thirty-day period. The buyer cannot waive this requirement, and any attempt to waive it is void.

A refund request form must be attached to each receipt and must contain the information in subparagraph (I) of paragraph (a) of this subsection (2) and the statement, in all capital letters of no less than ten-point, bold-faced type: "Refund request - this form must be postmarked by _________ (Date to be filled in). No refund will be given until the hearing aid or hearing aids are returned to the dispenser." A space for the buyer's address, telephone number, and signature must be provided. The buyer is required only to sign, list the buyer's current address and telephone number, and mail the refund request form to the dispenser. If the hearing aid is sold in the buyer's home, the buyer may require the dispenser to arrange the return of the hearing aid.

Represents that the service or advice of a person licensed to practice medicine will be used or made available in the selection, fitting, adjustment, maintenance, or repair of hearing aids when that is not true or using the terms "doctor", "clinic", "state-licensed clinic", "state-registered", "state-certified", or "state-approved" or any other term, abbreviation, or symbol when it would:

Falsely give the impression that service is being provided by persons trained in medicine or that the dispenser's service has been recommended by the state when that is not the case; or

Be false or misleading;

Directly or indirectly:

Gives or offers to give, or permits or causes to be given, money or anything of value to any person who advises another in a professional capacity as an inducement to influence the person or have the person influence others to purchase or contract to purchase products sold or offered for sale by the dispenser; except that a dispenser does not violate this subparagraph (I) if the dispenser pays an independent advertising or marketing agent compensation for advertising or marketing services the agent rendered on the dispenser's behalf, including compensation that is paid for the results or performance of the services on a per-patient basis; or

Influences or attempts to influence any person to refrain from dealing in the products of competitors;

Dispenses a hearing aid to a person who has not been given tests utilizing appropriate established procedures and instrumentation in the fitting of hearing aids, except when selling a replacement hearing aid within one year after the date of the original purchase;

Makes a false or misleading statement of fact concerning goods or services or the buyer's right to cancel with the intention or effect of deterring or preventing the buyer from exercising the buyer's right to cancel, or refuses to honor a buyer's request to cancel a contract for the purchase of a hearing aid, if the request was made during the rescission period set forth in paragraph (e) of this subsection (2);

Employs a device, a scheme, or artifice with the intent to defraud a buyer of a hearing aid;

Intentionally disposes of, conceals, diverts, converts, or otherwise fails to account for any funds or assets of a buyer of a hearing aid that is under the dispenser's control; or

Charges, collects, or recovers any cost or fee for any good or service that has been represented by the dispenser as free.

This section applies to a dispenser who dispenses hearing aids in this state.

This section does not apply to the dispensing of hearing aids outside of this state so long as the transaction either conforms to this section or to the applicable laws and rules of the jurisdiction in which the transaction takes place.

THE BUYER HAS THE RIGHT TO CANCEL THIS PURCHASE FOR ANY REASON AT ANY TIME PRIOR TO 12 MIDNIGHT ON THE

[insert applicable rescission period, which must be no shorter than thirty days after receipt of the hearing aid]

CALENDAR DAY AFTER RECEIPT OF THE HEARING AID BY GIVING OR MAILING THE DISPENSER WRITTEN NOTICE OF CANCELLATION AND BY RETURNING THE HEARING AID, UNLESS THE HEARING AID HAS BEEN SIGNIFICANTLY DAMAGED BEYOND REPAIR WHILE THE HEARING AID WAS IN THE BUYER'S CONTROL.

Source:

L. 99:

Entire part added with relocations, p. 637, § 2, effective May 18.

L. 2000:

(1)(d), (1)(f), IP(2), (2)(a)(I), (2)(a)(II), (2)(a)(III), (2)(c)(I), (2)(c)(II), (2)(e)(I), (2)(e)(II), (2)(e)(III), (2)(g), and (2)(j) amended and (1)(e.5) added, p. 1092, § 11, effective July 1; (1)(a) amended, p. 1837, § 1, effective August 2.

L. 2007:

Entire section repealed, p. 810, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 2013:

Entire section RC&RE, (SB 13-228), ch. 271, p. 1420, § 1, effective May 24.

L. 2020:

(2)(a)(III) and (2)(e)(III)(B) amended and (2)(c)(I) repealed, (HB 20-1218), ch. 299, p. 1484, § 3, effective September 1; (2)(a)(III), (2)(c), and (2)(e)(III)(B) amended, (HB 20-1219), ch. 300, p. 1492, § 3, effective September 1.

6-1-702. Unsolicited facsimiles - deceptive trade practice - definitions.

A person engages in a deceptive trade practice when, in the course of such person's business, vocation, or occupation, such person:

Uses a telephone facsimile machine, computer, or other device to send an unsolicited advertisement to a telephone facsimile machine;

Uses a computer or other electronic device to send any message via a telephone facsimile machine unless such person clearly marks, in a margin at the top or bottom of each transmitted page of the message or on the first page of the transmission:

The date and time the facsimile is sent;

An identification of the person sending the facsimile; and

The telephone number of the sending machine of the person; or

Violates 47 U.S.C. sec. 227 or any rule promulgated thereunder.

For the purposes of this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Telephone facsimile machine" means equipment that has the capacity to:

Transcribe text or images from paper into an electronic signal and to transmit that signal over a regular telephone line; or

Transcribe text or images from an electronic signal received over a regular telephone line onto paper.

"Unsolicited advertisement" means material that advertises the commercial availability or quality of any property, good, or service and that is transmitted to a person without that person's prior express invitation or permission.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to:

A person who has an existing business relationship with the person receiving a facsimile; or

A nonprofit organization operating pursuant to 26 U.S.C. sec. 501 (c) of the federal "Internal Revenue Code of 1986", as amended, that sends a facsimile to a nonmember recipient, if the nonprofit organization has received, by facsimile or other means, such nonmember recipient's prior express written invitation or permission to deliver facsimiles that includes the recipient's signature and facsimile number.

For the purposes of this subsection (3), "existing business relationship" means a relationship formed by a voluntary two-way communication between a person or entity and a residential or business subscriber, with or without an exchange of consideration on the basis of an inquiry, application, purchase, membership, or transaction by the residential or business subscriber regarding products or services offered by such person or entity.

Source:

L. 99:

Entire part added with relocations, p. 641, § 2, effective May 18.

L. 2004:

Entire section R&RE, p. 406, § 1, effective August 4.

L. 2005:

(3) added, p. 463, § 1, effective May 4.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 6-1-105 (1)(p.3), (1)(p.5), and (1)(p.7), as it existed prior to 1999.

6-1-702.5. Commercial electronic mail messages - deceptive trade practice - remedies - definitions - short title - legislative declaration.

This section shall be known and may be cited as the "Spam Reduction Act of 2008".

A person engages in a deceptive trade practice when, in the course of such person's business, vocation, or occupation, such person:

Violates any provision of the federal "Controlling the Assault of Non-Solicited Pornography and Marketing ('CAN-SPAM') Act of 2003", 15 U.S.C. secs. 7701 to 7713, or any rule promulgated under the federal act that can be enforced by states or providers of internet access service pursuant to 15 U.S.C. sec. 7706 (f) or (g);

Knowingly fails to disclose the actual point-of-origin electronic mail address of a commercial electronic mail message in order to mislead or deceive the recipient as to the source or sender of the message;

Knowingly falsifies electronic mail transmission information or other routing information for a commercial electronic mail message in order to mislead or deceive the recipient as to the source or sender of the message;

Knowingly uses a third party's internet address or domain name without the third party's consent for the purposes of transmitting a commercial electronic mail message; or

Knowingly sends a commercial electronic mail message to any person that has previously given the sender a do-not-email directive under 15 U.S.C. sec. 7704 (a)(3)(A) or provides the electronic mail address of any such person to a third party for the purpose of enabling the third party to send a commercial electronic mail message, other than pursuant to affirmative consent, to that electronic mail address.

As used in this section:

"Affirmative consent" has the same meaning as set forth in 15 U.S.C. sec. 7702.

"Commercial electronic mail message" has the same meaning as set forth in 15 U.S.C. sec. 7702.

"Electronic mail service provider" means a provider of internet access service, as defined in 47 U.S.C. sec. 231.

"Sender" has the same meaning as set forth in 15 U.S.C. sec. 7702.

In the case of any violation of this section, an electronic mail service provider whose network or facilities were used in the transmission or attempted transmission of a commercial electronic mail message may file a civil action in a court of competent jurisdiction and may, upon proof of such violation, recover such sums as are allowed under this subsection (4).

In any such action, if the electronic mail service provider prevails, the provider shall be entitled to actual damages. Upon a showing that the sender of a commercial electronic mail message violated any provision of this section, whether or not the violation resulted in a financial loss or injury, the electronic mail service provider may recover attorney fees and costs.

In any such action, if the electronic mail service provider prevails, the provider is also entitled to recover, as part of the judgment, statutory damages in the amount of one thousand dollars for each commercial electronic mail message transmitted in violation of this section; except that the total amount of statutory damages awarded against a single defendant based on one transaction or occurrence shall not exceed ten million dollars.

The remedies, duties, prohibitions, and penalties of this subsection (4) are not exclusive and are in addition to all other causes of action, remedies, and penalties provided by law.

At the request of any party to an action brought pursuant to this subsection (4), the court may, in its discretion, conduct all legal proceedings in such a way as to protect the secrecy and security of any computer, computer network, computer data, or computer software involved in order to prevent possible recurrence of the same or similar conduct by another person and to protect the trade secrets of any party.

Electronic mail service providers that adopt and implement terms, conditions, or technical measures in good faith to prevent or prohibit the origination or transmission of commercial electronic mail messages in violation of this section shall be immune from civil liability for any such actions, and no provision of this section shall be construed to create any liability for such actions.

No electronic mail service provider shall be liable for the mere transmission of commercial electronic mail messages over the provider's computer network or facilities.

This section shall not be construed to require any electronic mail service provider to carry or deliver any electronic mail merely because a sender complies with the provisions of this section.

This section shall apply when a commercial electronic mail message is sent to a computer located in Colorado or to an electronic mail address that the sender knows, or has reason to know, is held by a Colorado resident.

The attorney general is hereby specifically authorized to take all actions and invoke all remedies authorized under 15 U.S.C. sec. 7706 (f) to enforce this section. Such actions and remedies are not exclusive and are in addition to all other causes of action, remedies, and penalties provided by this article and any other state or federal law.

The attorney general is encouraged to and may, in his or her discretion, cooperate with an electronic mail service provider in an action by such provider under 15 U.S.C. sec. 7706 (g).

The general assembly:

Finds that all violations of the federal "CAN-SPAM Act of 2003" are inherently false and deceptive;

Determines that falsity and deception in any portion of a commercial electronic mail message or an attachment thereto harms Colorado consumers and threatens Colorado's economy; and

Declares that the intent of this section and of section 18-5-308, C.R.S., is to exercise state authority in a manner consistent with, and to the maximum extent permissible under, the federal preemption provisions of 15 U.S.C. sec. 7707 (b).

Source:

L. 2008:

Entire section added, p. 593, § 1, effective August 5.

6-1-703. Time shares and resale time shares - deceptive trade practices.

A person engages in a deceptive trade practice when, in the course of the person's business, vocation, or occupation, the person engages in one or more of the following activities in connection with the advertisement or sale of a time share or the provision of a time share resale service:

Misrepresents:

The investment, resale, or rental value of any time share;

The conditions under which a purchaser may exchange the right to use accommodations or facilities in one location for the right to use accommodations or facilities in another location; or

The period of time during which the accommodations or facilities contracted for will be available to the purchaser;

Fails to allow any purchaser a right to rescind the sale of a time share or a time share resale service within five calendar days after the sale;

Fails to provide conspicuous notice on the contract of the right of a purchaser of a time share or time share resale service to rescind the sale in writing either by electronic means, mail, or hand delivery.

For purposes of this section, notice of rescission is given:

If by mail, when postmarked;

If by electronic mail or other electronic means, when sent; or

If by hand delivery, when delivered to the seller's place of business.

Fails to refund any down payment or deposit made pursuant to a time share contract or contract for time share resale service within seven days after the seller or time share resale entity receives the purchaser's written notice of rescission; except that, if the purchaser's check has not cleared at the time notice of rescission is received, the person has seven additional days after receipt of funds from the purchaser's cleared check to refund the down payment or deposit;

With respect to the sale or solicitation of any time share resale service, makes false or misleading statements, including statements concerning:

The existence of offers to buy or rent the resale time share;

The likelihood of, or the time necessary to complete, any sale, rental, transfer, or invalidation;

The value of the resale time share;

The current or future costs of owning the resale time share, including assessments, maintenance fees, or taxes;

How amounts paid by the purchaser of the time share resale service will be utilized;

The method or source from which the name, address, telephone number, or other contact information of the owner of the resale time share was obtained;

The identity of the time share resale entity or that entity's affiliates; or

The terms and conditions upon which the time share resale service is offered;

Engages in any time share resale service without first obtaining a written contract to provide the service, which contract is signed by the purchaser of the time share resale service and complies with the requirements of this section. For purposes of paragraph (c) of this subsection (1), the required notice of rescission rights applicable to a contract for a time share resale service is conspicuous if printed in at least fourteen-point, bold-faced type immediately preceding the space in the contract provided for the purchaser's signature. In addition to any other remedy provided in this article, a time share resale service contract that does not satisfy the requirements of this section is voidable at the option of the purchaser for up to one year after the date the purchaser executes the contract.

With respect to time share resale transfer agreements, fails to comply with any provision of, or otherwise makes false or misleading statements in connection with, any disclosure or other act required to be made or observed under section 6-1-703.5.

The unlawful practices listed in this section are in addition to, and do not limit, the types of deceptive trade practices actionable under section 6-1-105.

No person shall knowingly circumvent the requirements of this section or section 6-1-703.5.

A person who, as director, officer, or agent of a time share resale entity or as agent of a person who violates this article, assists or aids, directly or indirectly, in a violation of this article is responsible equally with the person for which the person acts.

In the prosecution of a person as officer, director, or agent, it is sufficient to allege and prove the unlawful intent of the person or entity for which the person acts.

Source:

L. 99:

Entire part added with relocations, p. 642, § 2, effective May 18.

L. 2013:

Entire section amended, (SB 13-182), ch. 166, p. 541, § 2, effective August 7.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 6-1-105 (1)(s), as it existed prior to 1999.

6-1-703.5. Time share resale transfer agreements - deceptive trade practices.

A time share resale entity engages in a deceptive trade practice when the entity fails to include in a time share resale transfer agreement the following information:

The name, telephone number, and physical address of the time share resale entity and the name and address of any agent or third-party service provider who will perform any of the time share resale services for that time share resale entity;

A description of the applicable resale time share legally sufficient for recording or other legal transfer;

A description of the method or documentation by which the transfer of the resale time share will be completed, including whether:

The owner of the resale time share will retain any interest in the resale time share following the transfer; and

The owner of the resale time share must grant a power of attorney or otherwise delegate any authority necessary to complete the transfer of the resale time share and the scope of the authority delegated by the owner of the resale time share;

If the owner of the resale time share will retain any interest in the resale time share, a description of the interests retained by the owner of the resale time share;

A listing of any fees, costs, or other consideration that the owner of the resale time share must pay or reimburse for performance of the time share resale service;

A statement that neither the time share resale entity nor any affiliate or agent of the entity shall collect from the owner of the resale time share any fees, costs, or other consideration until the time share resale entity:

Provides the owner of the resale time share a copy of the recordable deed or other equivalent written evidence clearly demonstrating that the resale time share has been transferred to a subsequent transferee in accordance with the time share resale transfer agreement and applicable law; and

Satisfies all other requirements of this section;

The date by which all acts sufficient to transfer the resale time share in accordance with the time share resale transfer agreement are estimated to be completed. The time share resale entity shall use commercially reasonable good faith efforts to complete the transfer of the subject time share within the estimated period. Commercially reasonable good faith efforts include making a request to the association of time share owners pursuant to section 38-33.3-316 (8), C.R.S., for a written statement detailing unpaid assessments levied against the time share.

A statement as to whether any person, including the owner of the resale time share, may occupy, rent, exchange, or otherwise exercise any form of use of the resale time share during the term of the time share resale transfer agreement;

The name of any person, other than the owner of the resale time share, who will receive any rents, profits, or other consideration or thing of value, if any, generated from the transfer of the applicable resale time share or the use of the applicable resale time share during the term of the time share resale transfer agreement;

The following statement clearly and conspicuously and in substantially the following form:

A statement that the time share resale entity will notify the following persons or entities, in writing, when ownership of the resale time share is transferred, as applicable:

The association of time share owners or other persons responsible for managing or operating the plan or arrangement by which the rights or interests associated with the applicable time share resale are utilized; and

The exchange company operating any exchange program that the resale time share was part of at the time the transfer was completed.

In making the disclosures required under this section, the time share resale entity may rely upon information provided in writing by the owner of the applicable resale time share or the developer, association of time share owners, or other person responsible for managing or operating the plan or arrangement by which the rights or interests associated with the applicable resale time share are utilized.

A time share resale entity shall not transfer or offer to assist in transferring a resale time share, or receive consideration in connection with the transfer of a resale time share, if the time share resale entity knows that the transferee does not have the ability or the intent to fulfill the obligations of ownership of the resale time share, including the obligation to pay all assessments and taxes incurred in connection with ownership of the resale time share. If a time share resale entity transfers or offers to transfer, or receives compensation in connection with the transfer of, a resale time share to a person who has a demonstrated pattern of nonpayment of assessments or taxes or the demonstrated inability to meet payment obligations, the actions of the time share resale entity are prima facie evidence of a violation of this subsection (3).

A time share resale entity shall supervise, manage, and control all aspects of the time share resale transfer agreement and the offering of the resale time share by any affiliate, agent, contractor, or employee of that time share resale entity. A violation of this section is a violation by the time share resale entity and by the person actually committing the conduct that constitutes the violation.

If a time share resale entity engages in an act that is prohibited by this section, either directly or as a means to avoid or circumvent the purpose of this section, a person injured by the act may bring a private civil action pursuant to section 6-1-113.

We [name of time share resale entity] will use commercially reasonable good faith efforts to transfer ownership of your resale time share to another person within the period we estimate for completing the transfer. Until the transfer of ownership is complete, you, the resale time share owner, will continue to be responsible for the payment of all costs and fees associated with your resale time share, including, as applicable, regular assessments, special assessments, and real and personal property taxes.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire section added, (SB 13-182), ch. 166, p. 543, § 3, effective August 7.

6-1-704. Health clubs - deceptive trade practices.

A person engages in a deceptive trade practice when, in the course of such person's business, vocation, or occupation, such person engages in one or more of the following activities in connection with the advertisement or sale of a membership in a health club:

Fails to allow any buyer of a membership in a health club to rescind the membership contract within three business days after receipt by the buyer of a copy of the contract;

Fails to provide conspicuous notice of the right of a purchaser of a health club membership to rescind the sale either by telegram, mail, or hand delivery. For purposes of this section, notice of rescission is considered given, if by mail when postmarked, if by telegram when filed for telegraphic transmission, or if by hand delivery when delivered to the seller's place of business.

Fails to allow the buyer, or the estate of the buyer, to cancel the membership contract when:

The buyer dies;

The buyer becomes totally physically disabled as determined by a licensed physician or advanced practice registered nurse for the duration of the membership contract;

The health club is moved to a location that is more than five miles from the location of the establishment when the buyer entered into the membership contract;

The membership in the health club is transferred to a location of the same club or another club, which location is more than five miles from the location of the club when the buyer entered into the contract, and this transfer occurs because of cessation of health club services at the club location from which the membership is transferred;

The seller permanently discontinues operation of the health club or sells the health club and the sale results in substantial alteration of the quality of health club services or facilities or the nature of benefits so that they no longer conform to the provisions of the membership contract, but there shall be a thirty-day "right to cure" during which the fees payable by the buyer under the membership contract shall be suspended and the health club may bring the services, facilities, and benefits into conformance with the provisions of the membership contract;

Fails to refund all payments made pursuant to the membership contract, less a prorated fee for days of actual use of the health club by the buyer, within fifteen days after the seller receives the buyer's written notice of rescission;

When a health club is planned or under construction, and the sale of the membership takes place before the health club is completed, fails to:

Disclose clearly and conspicuously in the membership contract the date on which the health club will open for use;

Escrow all preopening membership sales receipts in a separate account in a bank or trust company doing business in the state of Colorado or provide a cash bond, letter of credit, certificate of deposit, or other similar surety, in the amount of fifty thousand dollars, for the repayment of amounts actually paid under preopening membership agreements until the health club is open for business;

Allow the buyer to cancel the membership contract and receive a full refund of all payments made pursuant to the membership contract if the date the health club will open for use is delayed more than sixty days from the date of opening specified in the membership contract;

Sells any membership contract, the actual or financial duration of which, including any option to renew, is longer than twenty-four months; except that a person does not engage in a deceptive trade practice when such person sells any membership contract the actual or financial duration of which is not longer than thirty-six months with a buyer's option to renew annually thereafter if:

The health club has been in operation in this state more than two years; and

The health club maintains a bond with a corporate surety from a company authorized to do business in this state or other security acceptable to and approved by the attorney general; and

The aggregate amount of the bond is one hundred thousand dollars for each club location; and

The bond is payable to the state for the benefit of any buyer injured in the event the health club goes out of business prior to the expiration of the buyer's membership contract; and

The bond is maintained for so long as the health club has any membership contracts in place and outstanding, the specified term for which exceeds twenty-four months; and

The bond is not canceled, revoked, or terminated except after notice to, and with the written consent of, the attorney general at least forty-five days in advance of such cancellation, revocation, or termination; and

The annual renewal option for continued membership contained in the membership contract is not automatic but requires that the buyer affirmatively accept the renewal option by notice in writing to the person selling the membership contract for reasonable consideration on or before the expiration of each contract term, but not more than six months prior to the expiration of any contract term; and

In the event that the health club elects to cancel, revoke, or terminate the bond, it posts a notice of such action, in twenty-four-point bold-faced type, to its customers, on the front door of such health club; or

Makes any representation, orally or in writing, in connection with the offer or sale of a membership in a health club that a membership contract is for a lifetime or is for a perpetual membership, or uses coercive sales tactics, or misrepresents the quality, benefits, or nature of the services.

Source:

L. 99:

Entire part added with relocations, p. 643, § 2, effective May 18.

L. 2008:

(1)(c)(II) amended, p. 123, § 1, effective January 1, 2009.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 6-1-105 (1)(t), as it existed prior to 1999.